Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1217
Fees; disposition.

All fees collected under the provisions of sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 shall be paid promptly into the state treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 17, p. 1186.